Nebraska, session 109, LB124.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB124 LB124
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-394, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-394 (1) A person who causes the death of an unborn child
unintentionally while engaged in the operation of a motor vehicle in
violation of the law of the State of Nebraska or in violation of any city
or village ordinance commits motor vehicle homicide of an unborn child.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, motor
vehicle homicide of an unborn child is a Class I misdemeanor.
(3)(a) If the proximate cause of the death of an unborn child is the
operation of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,213 or
60-6,214, motor vehicle homicide of an unborn child is a Class IIIA
felony.
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, if the
proximate cause of the death of an unborn child is the operation of a
motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197.06, motor
vehicle homicide of an unborn child is a Class IIA IIIA felony and the
court shall, as part of the judgment of conviction, order the person not
to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose for a period of at least sixty
days and not more than fifteen years after the date ordered by the court
and shall order that the operator's license of such person be revoked for
the same period. The revocation shall not run concurrently with any jail
term imposed.
(c) If the proximate cause of the death of an unborn child is the
operation of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,196 or
60-6,197.06 and the defendant has a prior conviction for a violation of
section 60-6,196 or a city or village ordinance enacted in conformance
with section 60-6,196, motor vehicle homicide of an unborn child is a
Class II IIA felony and the court shall, as part of the judgment of
conviction, order the person not to drive any motor vehicle for any
purpose for a period of at least sixty days and not more than fifteen
years after the date ordered by the court and shall order that the
-2-

LB124 LB124
2025 2025
operator's license of such person be revoked for the same period. The
revocation shall not run concurrently with any jail term imposed.
(4) The crime punishable under this section shall be treated as a
separate and distinct offense from any other offense arising out of acts
alleged to have been committed while the person was in violation of this
section.
Sec. 2. Original section 28-394, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-